Nebraska, session 109, LB1049.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1049 LB1049
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, regulatory action
means the adoption, promulgation, amendment, or withdrawal of a rule or
regulation as defined in section 84-901.
(2) Along with a fiscal note, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall
prepare and submit an economic impact report to the appropriate standing
committee of the Legislature, for any legislative bill that would
require, as the result of being signed into law, regulatory action by an
agency as defined in section 84-901.
(3) The economic impact report shall include a cost benefit analysis
including:
(a) The estimated primary or direct benefits;
(b) The estimated cost savings or financial benefits to society;
(c) The estimated number of businesses or other entities to which
the regulatory action will apply;
(d) The identity of any localities and types of businesses or other
entities that will be particularly affected by the regulatory action;
(e) The estimated compliance costs for regulated entities, including
costs for affected businesses, localities, or entities;
(f) The estimated impact on the use and value of private property,
including additional costs related to the development of real estate for
commercial or residential purposes;
(g) The estimated effect on state expenditures, including estimated
administrative expenses;
(h) The estimated secondary or indirect costs; and
(i) Key assumptions and sources of uncertainty.
(4) State agencies shall cooperate with the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst by providing any information relevant to the economic impact
report.
Sec. 2. Section 84-906.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-906.03 It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State:
-2-

LB1049 LB1049
2026 2026
(1) To establish and cause to be compiled, indexed by subject, and
published a codification system for all rules and regulations filed to be
designated the Nebraska Administrative Code;
(2) To cause the Nebraska Administrative Code to be computerized to
facilitate agencies in revision of their rules and regulations and
provide research capabilities;
(3) To post a current copy of existing rules and regulations as
accepted by the Secretary of State as filed on the website of the
Secretary of State; to distribute a current copy of any existing rules
and regulations as accepted by the Secretary of State as filed to all
interested persons on request at a price fixed to cover costs of
printing, handling, and mailing; and to distribute, on a regular basis,
copies of any or all modifications or amendments to agency rules and
regulations as accepted by the Secretary of State as filed to all
interested persons on request at a price fixed to cover costs of
printing, handling, and mailing; and
(4) To remit fees collected pursuant to this section to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund; and .
(5) To create and submit to the Clerk of the Legislature at the end
of each calendar year, a report, indexed by agency, including the total
number of new and amended rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
that year.
Sec. 3. Original section 84-906.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-